Utah statutes.
77-38a-502.   Collection from inmate offenders.
In addition to the remedies provided in Section 77-38a-501, the department
upon written request of the prosecutor, victim, or parole or probation agent,
shall collect restitution from offender funds held by the department as
provided in Section 64-13-23.
